test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-karsin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - karsin: # 2B
    karsin+N+Sg+Nom: karsin
    karsin+N+Sg+Gen: karssin
    karsin+N+Sg+Acc: karssin
    karsin+N+Sg+Ill: karsinân
    karsin+N+Sg+Loc: karsinist
    karsin+N+Sg+Com: karsináin
    karsin+N+Sg+Abe: karssinttáá
    karsin+N+Ess:    karsinin
    karsin+N+Par:    karsinid
    karsin+N+Pl+Nom: karsineh
    karsin+N+Pl+Gen: karsinij
    karsin+N+Pl+Acc: karsinijd
    karsin+N+Pl+Ill: karsináid
    karsin+N+Pl+Loc: karsinijn
    karsin+N+Pl+Com: karsinijguin
    karsin+N+Pl+Abe: karsinijttáá
